Maine, session 132, LD1335.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §1202 is amended to read:
§1202. Postponement or continuance
The trial of any criminal case, except for a trial for a crime punishable by imprisonment
for life prior to January 1, 2026, may be postponed by the court to a future day of the same
term, or the jury may be discharged therefrom and the case continued, if justice will thereby
be promoted.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §152-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. C, §58,
is further amended to read:
2. Aggravated attempted murder is a Class A crime, except that, notwithstanding
section 1604, subsection 1, paragraph A, the sentence for a person convicted of aggravated
attempted murder is prior to January 1, 2026 must be sentenced by the court to
imprisonment for life or for a definite period of imprisonment for any term of years; and a
person convicted of aggravated attempted murder on or after January 1, 2026 may not be
sentenced by the court to imprisonment for life or for any term of years equivalent to
imprisonment for life, and the court shall set a term of imprisonment for a definite period
of any term of years. The In the case of a person convicted of aggravated attempted murder
prior to January 1, 2026, existence of an aggravating circumstance serves only as a
precondition for the court to consider a life sentence.
As used in this subsection, "term of years equivalent to imprisonment for life" has the same
meaning as in section 1604, subsection 9.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1603, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
1. Sentence. A person convicted of the crime of murder prior to January 1, 2026 must
be sentenced to imprisonment for life or for any term of years that is not less than 25 years.
A person convicted of the crime of murder on or after January 1, 2026 may not be sentenced
by the court to imprisonment for life or for any term of years equivalent to imprisonment
for life, and the court shall set a term of imprisonment for any term of years that is not less
than 25 years. The sentence of the court must specify the length of the sentence to be
served and must commit the person to the Department of Corrections.
As used in this subsection, "term of years equivalent to imprisonment for life" has the same
meaning as in section 1604, subsection 9.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1604, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2,
is amended to read:
A. In the case of a person convicted of the Class A crime of aggravated attempted
murder prior to January 1, 2026, the court shall set a term of imprisonment under
section 152‑A, subsection 2 of for life or for a definite period of any term of years. In
the case of a person convicted of the Class A crime of aggravated attempted murder on
or after January 1, 2026, the court may not sentence the person to imprisonment for life
or for any term of years equivalent to imprisonment for life, and the court shall set a
term of imprisonment under section 152-A, subsection 2 for a definite period of any
term of years;
Page 1 - 132LR0570(01)

Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1604, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Sentences of imprisonment on or after January 1, 2026. Notwithstanding any
provision of this Title to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2026, in sentencing a person
convicted of a crime under this Title, a court may not set a term of imprisonment for life or
for any term of years equivalent to imprisonment for life.
Sec. 6. 17-A MRSA §1604, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Definition; term of years equivalent to imprisonment for life. As used in this
section, "term of years equivalent to imprisonment for life" means a sentence of
imprisonment for a term of years that, as determined by the court based on the age of the
convicted person at the time of sentencing and other factors determined by the court, is
reasonably expected to result in the imprisonment of the person for the remainder of the
person's life.